Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.635, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Grant program administration. (a) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board may enter into an interagency agreement with the Office of Higher Education. The agreement may include a transfer of funds to the Office of Higher Education to help establish and administer the competitive grant process. The board must award grants to institutions located in various economic development regions throughout the state, but must not predetermine the number of institutions to be awarded grants under this section or set a limit for the amount that any one institution may receive as part of the competitive grant application process. (b) deleted text begin The board must establish a standard allowable dollar range for the amount of direct financial assistance an applicant institution may provide to each candidate. To determine the range, the board may collect de-identified data from institutions that received a grant during the previous grant period and calculate the average scholarship amount awarded to all candidates across all institutions using the most recent fiscal year data available. The calculation may be used to determine a scholarship range that is no more than 25 percent of this amount and no less than half the average of this amount. The purpose of direct financial assistance is to assist candidates matriculating through completing licensure programs if they demonstrate financial need after considering other grants and scholarships provideddeleted text end new text begin The amount of direct financial assistance granted for a teacher candidate must not exceed $5,000 per fiscal year of the awarded grant for each candidatenew text end . (c) All grants must be awarded by August 15 of the fiscal year in which the grants are to be usednew text begin or as soon as practicable if changes to the grant program or appropriation impact the timeline for grant awardsnew text end . An institution that receives a grant under this section may use the grant funds deleted text begin over a two-deleted text end new text begin for upnew text end tonew text begin anew text end four-year period to sustain support for teacher candidates at any stage from recruitment and program admission to graduation and licensure application.new text begin An institution may receive grants for overlapping fiscal years. When use of awarded grants from different fiscal years overlap in the same academic year, the maximum combined total of direct financial assistance an institution may provide to the same candidate in the same academic year is $10,000 from these overlapping grants.new text end Sec. 2. Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 2, article 2, section 45, is amended to read: Sec. 45. ASPIRING MINNESOTA TEACHERS OF COLOR SCHOLARSHIP deleted text begin PILOTdeleted text end PROGRAM. Subdivision 1. Scholarship deleted text begin pilotdeleted text end program established. The commissioner must establish a scholarship deleted text begin pilotdeleted text end program to support undergraduate and graduate students who are preparing to become teachers, have demonstrated financial need, and belong to racial or ethnic groups underrepresented in the state's teacher workforce. Subd. 2. Eligibility. (a) To be eligible for a scholarship under this section, an applicant must: (1) new text begin either: (i) new text end be admitted and enrolled in a teacher preparation program approved by the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board and be seeking initial licensuredeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end or new text begin (ii) new text end be enrolled in an eligible institution under new text begin Minnesota Statutes, new text end section 136A.103new text begin ,new text end and be completing deleted text begin a two-year program specifically designed to prepare early childhood educatorsdeleted text end new text begin an associate's degree in early childhood education, education, or special educationnew text end ; (2) affirm to the teacher preparation program or the Office of Higher Education that the applicant is a person of color or American Indian; (3) be meeting satisfactory academic progress as defined under new text begin Minnesota Statutes, new text end section 136A.101, subdivision 10; and (4) demonstrate financial need based on criteria developed by the commissioner. (b) An eligible applicant may receive a scholarship award more than once, but may receive a total of no more than deleted text begin $25,000deleted text end new text begin $30,000new text end in scholarship awards from the program. new text begin (c) An applicant may apply for both a scholarship under this section and an underrepresented student teacher grant under Minnesota Statutes, section 136A.1274, but may not receive an award from both programs during the same academic semester or term unless there are sufficient funds appropriated to support all eligible applicants. new text end Subd. 3. Scholarship award amount. (a) The commissioner must establish a priority application deadline and must give equal consideration to all eligible applicants regardless of the new text begin applicant's attended institution or the new text end order the application was received before the priority application deadline. If the funds available for the program are insufficient to make full awards to all eligible applicants who apply on or before the deadline, the commissioner must make awards based on the deleted text begin expected family contributiondeleted text end new text begin Student Aid Indexnew text end of an applicant, prioritizing applicants with the lowest deleted text begin expected family contributionsdeleted text end new text begin Student Aid Indexesnew text end . If there are multiple complete applications with identical deleted text begin expected family contributionsdeleted text end new text begin Student Aid Indexesnew text end ,new text begin awards must be randomly selected starting withnew text end those applications deleted text begin may be prioritized bydeleted text end new text begin received by the prioritynew text end application deleted text begin completion datedeleted text end new text begin deadline established by the commissionernew text end . (b) new text begin For eligible applicants enrolled in a teacher preparation program as part of a baccalaureate or postbaccalaureate degree program, new text end the maximum award amount is $10,000 per year for full-time studynew text begin that may be used to defray a teacher candidate's overall cost of attendance as determined by their attended institutionnew text end . new text begin For eligible applicants enrolled in an associate's degree program, the maximum award amount is $6,000 per year for full-time study. new text end For undergraduate students, full-time study means enrollment in a minimum of deleted text begin 15deleted text end new text begin 12new text end or more credits per term. For graduate students, full-time study means enrollment in a minimum of six graduate credits or the equivalent. (c) If an eligible applicant is enrolled new text begin full time new text end in a program for new text begin only new text end one term during the academic year, the new text begin applicant may receive no more than half of the applicable new text end maximum award amount deleted text begin is $5,000deleted text end . If an eligible applicant is enrolled deleted text begin partdeleted text end new text begin less than fullnew text end time, the award amount must be prorated on a per-credit basis. (d) Subject to the funds available for the program, and subject to the limitation in paragraph (e), the minimum award amount established under this section for full-time study must be no less than $1,000 per year. (e) An eligible applicant's individual award amount must not exceed the applicant's cost of attendance after deducting: (1) the student's deleted text begin expected family contributiondeleted text end new text begin Student Aid Indexnew text end ; (2) the sum of all state or federal grants and gift aid received, including a Pell Grant and state deleted text begin grantdeleted text end new text begin grantsnew text end ; (3) the sum of all institutional grants, scholarships, tuition waivers, and tuition remission amounts; and (4) the amount of any private grants or scholarships. (f) Awards are made until available funds are expended. Eligible applicants who completed their applications on or before the priority application deadline but who did not receive an award due to insufficient funds, and eligible applicants who completed their applications after the priority application deadline, shall be placed on an award waiting list by order of application completion date. Subd. 4. Administration. (a) The commissioner must establish an application process for individual students and institutions on behalf of all eligible students at the institution and other guidelines for implementing the scholarship program. (b) A scholarship award must be paid to the eligible applicant's teacher preparation institution on behalf of the eligible applicant. Awards may be paid only when the institution has confirmed to the commissioner the applicant's name, racial or ethnic identity, gender, licensure area sought, and enrollment status. new text begin Subd. 4a. new text end new text begin Account established. new text end new text begin An aspiring Minnesota teachers of color scholarship program account is created in the special revenue fund for depositing money appropriated to or received by the commissioner for the scholarship program. Money deposited in the account is appropriated to the commissioner, does not cancel, and is continuously available for scholarship awards under this section. new text end Subd. 5. Service expectation. An applicant who receives a scholarship under this section is expected to serve as a full-time teacher in Minnesota after completing the program for which the scholarship was awarded. Subd. 6. Report. By December 15 of each year, the commissioner must submit a full report on the details of the scholarship program for the previous fiscal year to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over deleted text begin E-12deleted text end new text begin kindergarten through grade 12 educationnew text end and higher education finance and policy. The reports must also be made available on the Office of Higher Education's website. The reports must include the following information: (1) the number of applicants and the number of award recipients, each broken down by postsecondary institution with ten or more recipients; (2) the total number of awards, the total dollar amount of all awards, and the average award amount; (3) summary data on the racial or ethnic identity, gender, licensure area sought, and enrollment status of all applicants and award recipients; and (4) other summary data identified by the commissioner as outcome indicators. Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Close education opportunity gaps. new text end new text begin (a) To support schools in their efforts to close education opportunity gaps under Minnesota Statutes, section 120B.113: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 3,000,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 3,000,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The department may retain up to five percent of this appropriation to administer the grant program. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; OFFICE OF HIGHER EDUCATION.new text end new text begin (a) $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund for transfer to the aspiring Minnesota teachers of color scholarship program account in the special revenue fund under Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 2, article 2, section 45, as amended by this act. The commissioner of the Office of Higher Education and the commissioner of management and budget shall transfer to the program's special revenue fund account any remaining balance of the amount appropriated for the program in Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 2, article 1, section 2, subdivision 38. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may use no more than $200,000 of this appropriation to administer the program. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes shall codify Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 2, article 2, section 45, as amended by this act, as a new section in Minnesota Statutes numbered section 136A.1273. new text end